District of Columbia statutes.
9-101.09

Resubdivision of property affected by highway plan pending condemnation proceedings.

Where any proposed street of the permanent system of highways affects any lot or block of a subdivision recorded in the Office of the Surveyor of the District of Columbia, the Mayor of the District of Columbia may, in his discretion, allow the resubdivision of such lot or block in a manner conforming to the original subdivision until such time as condemnation proceedings are begun for the opening of the proposed street affecting the land to be subdivided.

Feb. 26, 1904, 33 Stat. 51, ch. 164
1981 Ed., § 7-119.
1973 Ed., § 7-119.
Delegation of Authority-Office of the Surveyor, see Mayor’s Order 2005-180, November 28, 2005 ( 53 DCR 462).
This section originated at a time when local government powers were delegated to a Board of Commissioners of the District of Columbia (see Acts Relating to the Establishment of the District of Columbia and its Various Forms of Governmental Organization in Volume 1). Section 401 of Reorganization Plan No. 3 of 1967 (see Reorganization Plans in Volume 1) transferred all of the functions of the Board of Commissioners under this section to a single Commissioner. The District of Columbia Self-Government and Governmental Reorganization Act, 87 Stat. 818, § 711 ( D.C. Code, § 1-207.11), abolished the District of Columbia Council and the Office of Commissioner of the District of Columbia. These branches of government were replaced by the Council of the District of Columbia and the Office of Mayor of the District of Columbia, respectively. Accordingly, and also pursuant to § 714(a) of such Act ( D.C. Code, § 1-207.14(a)), appropriate changes in terminology were made in this section.